it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori per cuffie e auricolari: Custodie per cuffie; Kit di pulizia delle cuffie; Gommini e copriauricolari; Parti di ricambio delle cuffie; Pelli e involucri per cuffie; Supporti per cuffie
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для наушников и гарнитур: Футляры для наушников; Наборы для чистки наушников; Амбушюры и вкладыши для наушников; Запасные части для наушников; Наклейки и обложки для наушников; Подставки для наушников
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > 헤드폰/헤드셋 부대용품: 헤드폰 휴대용 케이스; 헤드폰 클리닝 키트; 헤드폰 쿠션/팁; 헤드폰 교체 부품; 헤드폰 스킨 및 랩; 헤드폰 거치대
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de auscultadores e auriculares: Estojos para transporte de auscultadores; Kit de limpeza para auscultadores; Pontas e almofadas para auscultadores; Peças de substituição para auscultadores; Skins e películas para auscultadores; Suportes para auscultadores
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Kopfhörer- & Headset-Zubehör: Transporttaschen für Kopfhörer; Kopfhörer-Reinigungssätze; Kopfhörer- & In-Ear-Ohrhörer-Polster; Kopfhörer-Ersatzteile; Kopfhörer-Skins und -Folien; Kopfhörerständer
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires pour écouteurs et casques audio: Étuis de transport pour écouteurs; Kits de nettoyage pour casques; Embouts et mousses pour écouteurs; Pièces de rechange pour casques; Habillages et films pour casques; Supports pour écouteurs
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii pentru căști audio și căști audio cu microfon: Huse pentru căști; Kituri de curățare pentru căști; Pernițe și dopuri pentru căști; Piese de schimb pentru căști; Skinuri și folii pentru căști; Standuri pentru căști
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za slušalke in naglavne slušalke: Torbice za slušalke; Kompleti za čiščenje slušalk; Ušesne blazinice in čepki za slušalke; Nadomestni deli za slušalke; Ovitki in nalepke za slušalke; Stojala za slušalke
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > 头戴式耳机配件: 耳机便携包; 耳机清洁套装; 耳机罩/耳机套; 耳机替换部件; 耳机贴膜/保护膜; 耳机支架
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para fones de ouvido: Estojos para transporte de fones de ouvido; Kit de limpeza para fones de ouvido; Protetores e almofadas para fones de ouvido; Peças de substituição para fones de ouvido; Capas e adesivos para fones de ouvido; Suportes para fones de ouvido
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện tai nghe: Hộp đựng tai nghe; Bộ kit làm sạch tai nghe; Đệm và đầu mút tai nghe qua đầu; Linh kiện thay thế tai nghe; Da và vỏ bọc tai nghe; Giá đỡ tai nghe chụp tai
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ ακουστικών & headset: Θήκες μεταφοράς ακουστικών; Σετ καθαρισμού ακουστικών; Μαξιλαράκια & άκρα ακουστικών; Ανταλλακτικά ακουστικών; Αυτοκόλλητα & καλύμματα ακουστικών; Βάσεις ακουστικών
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios para auriculares: Estuches para auriculares; Kit de limpieza de auriculares; Almohadillas para auriculares y gomas para auriculares de tapón; Partes de repuesto de auriculares; Skins y envolturas de auriculares; Soportes para auriculares
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do słuchawek i zestawów słuchawkowych: Futerały na słuchawki; Zestawy czyszczące słuchawki; Poduszki i nakładki do słuchawek; Części zamienne słuchawek; Folia i oklejiny na słuchawki; Stojaki na słuchawki
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > Headphone & Headset Accessories: Headphone Carrying Cases; Headphone Cleaning Kits; Headphone Cushions & Tips; Headphone Replacement Parts; Headphone Skins & Wraps; Headphone Stands
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre slúchadlá a náhlavné súpravy: Puzdrá na prenos slúchadiel; Čistiace súpravy slúchadiel; Vankúšiky a štuple na slúchadlá; Náhradné diely slúchadiel; Nálepky a obaly na slúchadlá; Stojany na slúchadlá
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > Kulaklık Aksesuarları: Kulaklık Taşıma Kılıfları; Kulaklık Temizleme Kitleri; Kulaklık Yastıkları ve Uçları; Kulaklık Yedek Parçaları; Kulaklık Kaplamalar ve Sargılar; Kulaklık Standları
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > Fejhallgató és fülhallgató-kiegészítők: Fejhallgatóhordozó-tokok; Fejhallgató-tisztító készletek; Fejhallgatópárnák és -hegyek; Fejhallgató-pótalkatrészek; Fejhallgató-matricák és -burkolatok; Fejhallgatóállványok
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > Příslušenství ke sluchátkům a náhlavním soupravám: Pouzdra na sluchátka; Čisticí sady pro sluchátka; Náušníky ke sluchátkům; Náhradní díly pro sluchátka; Skiny a polepy pro sluchátka; Stojany na sluchátka
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za slušalice i slušalice s mikrofonom: Torbice za slušalice; Kompleti za čišćenje slušalica; Jastučići i gumice za slušalice; Zamjenski dijelovi za slušalice; Zaštitne naljepnice za slušalice; Stalci za slušalice
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Tilbehør til hodetelefoner og headset: Bærevesker for hodetelefoner; Rengjøringssett til hodetelefoner; Puter og tupper til hodetelefoner; Reservedeler til hodetelefoner; Trekk og folier til hodetelefoner; Stativer til hodetelefoner
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์หูฟังและชุดหูฟัง: กระเป๋าใส่หูฟัง; ชุดทำความสะอาดหูฟัง; ที่หุ้มและปลายของหูฟัง; อะไหล่เปลี่ยนหูฟัง; สติกเกอร์และแผ่นหุ้มหูฟัง; ที่วางหูฟัง
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Tillbehör till hörlurar och headsets: Fodral för hörlurar; Rengöringskit för hörlurar; Hörlurskuddar och hörlursadaptrar; Reservdelar till hörlurar; Skal och omslag till hörlurar; Hörlursställ
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > 耳機配件: 耳機攜帶箱; 耳機清潔套組; 耳機耳套/皮罩; 耳機替換零件; 耳機貼膜與包膜; 耳機架
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за слушалки: Калъфи за носене на слушалки; Комплекти за почистване на слушалки; Възглавнички и накрайници за слушалки; Резервни части за слушалки; Облепки и обвивки за слушалки; Стойки за слушалки
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > Ausinių ir ausinių su mikrofonais priedai: Ausinių nešiojimo dėklai; Ausidžių valymo rinkiniai; Ausinių pagalvėlės ir antgaliai; Ausidžių atsarginės dalys; Ausidės skins ir wraps; Ausinių stovai
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > Tilbehør til hovedtelefoner og headsets: Bæretasker til hovedtelefoner; Rengøringssæt til hovedtelefon; Ørepuder til hovedtelefoner; Reservedele til hovedtelefon; Skins og wraps til hovedtelefon; Hovedtelefonholdere
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Accessoires voor oor- en hoofdtelefoons: Draagdozen voor oortelefoons; Koptelefoon schoonmaakset; Oorschelpkussens en oortips; Koptelefoon vervangingsonderdelen; Koptelefoon skins en wraps; Oortelefoonstandaards
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > ヘッドフォン・ヘッドセット関連用品: ヘッドフォン持ち運び用ケース; ヘッドホンクリーニングキット; ヘッドフォンクッション・チップ; ヘッドホン交換部品; ヘッドホンスキン・ラップ; ヘッドフォンスタンド
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > Kuulokkeet ja kuuloketarvikkeet: Kuulokkeiden kantokotelot; Kuulokkeen puhdistussarja; Kuuloketyynyt ja -pehmusteet; Kuulokkeen varaosa; Kuulokkeen suoja ja tarra; Kuuloketelineet